dictsource/hak_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded
.L01 p t k // (rusheng
.L02 m n ng // (nosal coda consonant
.L03 a e i ii o u // vowel
.replace
//replace tone mark with tone number
a a
e e
i i
o o
u u
ṳ ii
â a1
ê e1
î i1
ô o1
û u1
m̂ m1
n̂ n1
n̂g ng1
à a2
è e2
ì i2
ò o2
ù u2
ǹ n2
á a3 
é e3
í i3
ó o3
ú u3
ḿ m3
ń n3
ńg ng3


// Note:  ngK  matches "ng" if not followed by a vowel
// (D  will match on a digit and also if no digit is present. (special for tone
// language).

.group a
       a        a
       a (_   a4
       a1i	ai1
       a2i	ai2
       a3i	ai3
       ai (_	ai4
       ai (L02   a4
       a5i	ai5
       a6i	ai6
	   a (L01 a5
       a̍ (L01 a6
       
       a1m	am1
       a2m  am2
       a3m  am3
       am (_  am4

       a1n	an1
       a2n  an2
       a3n  an3
       an (_  an4

       a1ng	aN1
       a2ng  aN2
       a3ng  aN3
       ang (_  aN4 
    
       a1u	au1
       a2u	au2
       a3u	au3
       au (_	au4
       au (L02	au4
       au (L01 au5
       au̍ (L01 au6


.group b
    @) b (K	_^_EN

.group c
       ch        ts
       chh	 tsh
       ch (i	 tS;
       chh (i    tS;h
       ch (ii    ts
       chh       tsh
    @) c (K	_^_EN

.group d
    @) d (K	_^_EN

.group e
       er (_  o-4
       e1r    o-1
       e2r    o-2
       e3r    o-3
       er (L02  o-4
       e (_  e4
       e (L02  e4
       er	o-
       e	e
       e (L02	e4
       e1u     eu1
       e2u     eu2
       e3u      eu3
       eu (_    eu4
       eu (L02    eu4
	   e (L01    e5
       er (L01  er5
       eu (L01  eu5
	   e̍ (L01   e6
	   e̍r (L01 er6
	   e̍u (L01 eu6
	   
.group f
       f        f
    @) f (K	_^_EN



.group h
       h        h
    @) h (K	_^_EN

.group i
       ii   i.
       iî   i.1
       iì   i.2
       ií   i.3
       ii (_  i.4
       ii (L02  i.4
       i (_   i4
       i (L02   i4
       i        i
       i (L01    i5
       ii (L01      i.5
       i̍ (L01     i6
       ii̍ (L01    i.6
       iîn      i.n1
       iìn	i.n2
       iín	i.n3
       iin	i.n4
       ia	ia
       ia (_  ia4
       ia (L02 ia4
       ia1i    jai1
       ia2i    jai2
       ia3i    jai3
       iai     jai4
       iau	iau
       ia1u	iau1
       ia2u	iau2
       ia3u	iau3
       iau (_	iau4
       iau (L02	iau4
       iau (L01	iau5
       ia̍u (L01	iau6
       ie (_     ie4
       ie (L02   ie4
	   ie1(L02  ie1
	   ie2(L02  ie2
	   ie3(L02  ie3
       ie (L01 ie5
       ie1u	jeu1
       ie2u	jeu2
       ie3u	jeu3
       ieu (_	jeu4
       io	io
       io (L01 io5
       io1ng	ioN1
       io2ng	ioN2
       io3ng	ioN3
       io4ng	ioN4
       iu	iu
       iu (L01 iu5
       
.group j
    @) j (K	_^_EN

.group k
       k        k
       kh	kh

.group l
       l        l
    @) l (K	_^_EN

.group m
       m        m
     _) m1 (_	m-1
     _) m̀  (_	m-2
     _) m3 (_	m-3
     _) m (_	m-4

.group n
       n        n
      _) n1 (_	n-1
     _) n2 (_  n-2
     _) n3 (_	n-3
     _) n (_	n-4
    _) n1g (_	N-1
     _) n2g (_	N-2
     _) n3g(_	N-3
     _) ng (_	N-4
       ng (i	n^    //ng(i)
       ng       N

.group g
    @) g (K	_^_EN

.group o
       o        o
       o (_   o4
       o (L02   o4
       o (L01  o5
       o̍ (L01  o6
       o1a	ua1
       o2a	ua2
       o3a	ua3
       oa (_	ua4
       oa (L02	ua4
       oa (L01	ua5
       o̍a (L01	ua6
       oa1	ua1
       oa2	ua2
       oa3	ua3
       oa4	ua4
       oa5	ua5
       oa6	ua6
       oa1i	uai1
       oa2i	uai2
       oa3i	uai3
       oai (_	uai4
       oai (L02	uai4
       oai (L01	uai5
       oa̍i	uai6
       
       o1e	ue1
       o2e	ue2
       o3e	ue3
       oe (_	ue4
       oe (L02	ue4
       oe (L01	ue5
       o̍e (L01	ue6
       oe1	ue1
       oe2	ue2
       oe3	ue3
       oe5	ue5
       oe6	ue6

       o1i	oi1
       o2i	oi2
       o3i	oi3
       oi (_	oi4
       oi (L02	oi4
       oi (L01	oi5
       o̍i (L01	oi6

       o1ng (_	oN1
       o2ng (_	oN2
       o3ng (_	oN3
       ong (_	oN4
       
       o1m (_	om1
       o2m (_	om2
       o3m (_	om3
       om (_	om4

       o1n (_	on1
       o2n (_	on2
       o3n (_	on3
       on (_	on4

.group p
       p        p
       ph	ph

.group q
    @) q (K	_^_EN

.group r
       r (K     _^_EN

.group s
       s        s
       s (i    S;
       s (ii    s
    @) s (K	_^_EN

.group t
       t        t
       th	th

.group u
       u        u
       u (_   u4
       u (L02   u4
       ui	ui
	   u1i  ui1
	   u2i  ui2
	   u3i  ui3
       ui (_  ui4
       ui (L02  ui4
       u1ng (_	uN1
       u2ng (_	uN2
       u3ng (_	uN3
       ung (_	uN4
       u (L01  u5
       u̍ (L01  u6
       ui (L01 ui5
       u̍i (L01 ui6
.group v
       v	v 

.group w
    @) w (K	_^_EN

.group x
    @) x (K	_^_EN

.group y
       y	j //before a o e i
       ya	ia
       ya (_	ia4
       ya (L01	ia5
	   ya (L02	ia4
       ya̍ (L01	ia6
       ya1i     jai1
       ya2i     jai2
       ya3i     jai3
       yai     jai4
       yau	iau
       yau (_	iau4
       ye	ie
       ye (_	ie4
	   ye (L02	ie4
       ye (L01  ie5
       ye̍ (L01  ie6
       yi	i
       yi (_	i4
	   yi (L02	i4
       yi (L01  i5
       yi̍ (L01     i6
       yo	io
       yo (_	io4
	   yo (L02	io4
       yu	iu
       yu (_	iu4
	   yu (L02	iu4
       yu (L01  iu5
       yu̍ (L01  iu6
       
    @) y (K	_^_EN

.group z
    @) z (K	_^_EN

//tone
.group
	1  1
	2  2
	3  3
	4  4
	5  5
	6  6
	|  _|
